Utah statutes.
4-33-4.   Administrative and enforcement powers of department.
The department shall administer and enforce this chapter and may:
(1)   make and enforce such rules, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, as it considers necessary for the effective
administration and enforcement of this chapter;
(2)  acquire and test motor fuel samples to determine compliance with this
chapter;
(3)  maintain and staff a laboratory to test motor fuel samples;
(4)  enter public or private premises during normal working hours to enforce
this chapter;
(5)  stop and detain any commercial vehicle transporting motor fuel to inspect
its contents and applicable documents or to acquire motor fuel samples; and
(6)  require that records applicable to this chapter be available for
examination and review upon request by the department.
